Hawaii statutes.
[§21E-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committee" means the joint
legislative management committee established under this chapter.

"Legislative service agency" means
the office of the auditor, the office of the legislative reference bureau, and
the office of the ombudsman.

"Legislative service agency director"
means the director or administrative head of a legislative service agency.

"Member" means a member of the joint
legislative management committee. [L 1990, c 127, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next